Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 5 Creditable Service

47-24-80.
Establishing creditable service.

The creditable service of a member shall include all established creditable prior service, service as a member of the Georgia National Guard since he or she became a member of the fund, and such other service as may be allowed as creditable service pursuant to this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-24-80

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1153, § 1.

47-24-81.
Transfer of service credits.

In addition to the creditable service allowed pursuant to Code Section 47-24-80, any member shall receive creditable service for any past service as a member of the United States Army, Army Reserve, Army National Guard, Navy, Navy Reserve, Marine Corps, Air Force, Air Force Reserve, Air National Guard, or Coast Guard if such service meets the same requirement for creditable time served as set forth for nonregular service retirement under Chapter 67 of Title 10 of the United States Code.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-24-81

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1153, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 139, § 1.

U.S. Code.

Retired pay for non-regular service,

10 U.S.C. § 1331

.

47-24-82.
Exceptions.

Any provision of this article to the contrary notwithstanding, no service which is used to qualify a member for a retirement or pension benefit based on length of service, age, or physical disability from any of the regular components of the United States armed forces shall be used as creditable service under this pension fund.

No provision in this chapter shall be construed as to affect or preclude any benefits to which a member may be entitled under any federal or private retirement or pension plan or any retirement or pension fund governed by this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-24-82

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1153, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 638, § 1.